Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska88-530.01
Commission; additional financial documents required; when.

In addition to the reviewed fiscal year-end financial statement required by section 88-528 and to detect noncompliance with financial requirements established by the commission pursuant to section 88-530, the commission shall, for good cause shown as determined by criteria set forth in commission rules and regulations, require (1) a verified report of the total grain inventory or (2) an audited financial statement. A verified report of grain inventory or audited financial statement shall be prepared in accordance with accounting principles generally accepted by a person or firm which holds a permit granted by the Nebraska State Board of Public Accountancy.

Laws 2003, LB 735, § 13;

Laws 2005, LB 52, § 6.